test/data/inspect/loansuffix.regex
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
[
    [a l e]   (->) [ a a l e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [a l h]   (->) [ a a l h   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e t]     (->) [ e e t e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e t e m] (->) [ e e t e m "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v]     (->) [ i j v e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v e]   (->) [ i j v e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v t]   (->) [ i j v e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v e r] (->) [ i j v h   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [u t t]   (->) [ u h t e   "<CORR>"]::30 
    || _ .#.
]
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]*  "<CORR>":0  [? - "<CORR>"]* ];
